Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3803
Villages; contract; cost; negotiated.

The cost to any village under a contract entered into pursuant to sections 19-3801 to 19-3804 shall be negotiated and included as a part of the formal contract entered into and agreed to by both parties.

Laws 1971, LB 594, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 57, § 1.